North Carolina, session 2025, SB815.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 30 of Article I of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 30. Militia and the right to bear arms.
A well regulated militia being necessary to the security of a free State, the right of the people
to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed; and, as standing armies in time of peace are
dangerous to liberty, they shall not be maintained, and the military shall be kept under strict
subordination to, and governed by, the civil power. Nothing herein shall justify the practice of
carrying concealed weapons, or prevent the General Assembly from enacting penal statutes
against that practice.Any citizen of the United States who (i) has not been indicted or convicted
of a violent crime or felony possession or distribution of a controlled substance and (ii) has not
been adjudicated mentally incompetent has the right to carry any legal weapon for self-defense,
either openly or concealed, with or without a permit, except on public or private property that is
legally posted against it. A system of concealed carry permits shall be maintained for purposes
of reciprocity with other states and ease of purchasing weapons, but no law-abiding citizen shall
be required to obtain such a permit to carry a concealed weapon."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the general election to be held on November 3, 2026, which
election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State. Ballots, voting
systems, or both may be used in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. The
question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to make it a right for any citizen who has not been indicted
or convicted of a violent crime to carry any legal weapon for self-defense, either openly or
concealed, with or without a permit, except on public or private property that is legally posted
against it."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the referendum
conducted under Section 2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment
among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the question are against
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment shall have no effect.
*S815-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section 3
of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set
out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 815-First Edition